Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1402.01
Individual training academies authorized.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice and the Nebraska State Patrol are authorized to maintain the independent and distinct operation of their individual training academies notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation.

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 1.